Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-104
Rules; revision; copies; distribution; filing.

The Jail Standards Board may, as it may deem necessary, amend the rules, and such amended rules shall be printed and disposed of by the county board and the sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail in the same manner as is directed by sections 47-102 and 47-103.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 4, p. 243;

R.S.1913, § 3532;

C.S.1922, § 2999;

C.S.1929, § 47-104;

R.S.1943, § 47-104;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 4.